Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 10 Division of Workforce Services Law
11-10-502. Weekly benefit amount.

For initial claims filed on or after the first day of the calendar quarter following July 22, 2015, an insured worker's weekly benefit amount shall be an amount equal to one-twenty-sixth (1/26) of his or her average wages for insured work paid during the four (4) quarters of his or her base period.

A weekly benefit amount shall not be less than twelve percent (12%) of the state average weekly wage for insured employment for the preceding calendar year for benefit years beginning after June 30, 1987.

However, effective July 1, 2012, the weekly minimum benefit amount established in subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall not be greater than eighty-one dollars ($81.00).

A weekly benefit amount shall not be greater than sixty-six and two-thirds percent (662/3%) of the state average weekly wage for insured employment for the previous calendar year for benefit years beginning after June 30, 1985.

However, effective July 1, 2012, the weekly maximum benefit amount established in subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall not be greater than four hundred fifty-one dollars ($451).

Weekly benefit amounts that are not in even multiples of one dollar ($1.00) shall be rounded to the next lower full dollar amount.

On June 1 of each year, the Director of the Division of Workforce Services shall determine the average weekly wage for insured employment for the preceding calendar year in the following manner:

The sum of the total monthly employment reported for the calendar year shall be divided by twelve (12) to determine the average monthly employment;

The sum of the total wages reported for the previous calendar year shall be divided by the average monthly employment to determine the average annual wage; and

The average annual wage shall be divided by fifty-two (52) to determine the average weekly wage for insured employment.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 3; 1943, No. 138, § 26; 1943, No. 263, § 1; 1947, No. 398, § 2; 1949, No. 155, § 3; 1955, No. 395, § 5; 1959, No. 13, § 1; 1963, No. 93, § 4; 1971, No. 35, § 7; 1977, No. 366, § 5; 1981, No. 43, § 2; 1983, No. 482, § 7; 1985, No. 8, § 3; 1985, No. 9, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1104; Acts 1987, No. 753, § 6; 1991, No. 48, § 2; 2001, No. 1367, § 3; 2001, No. 1757, § 8; 2003, No. 353, § 2; 2011, No. 861, § 1; 2015, No. 412, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 233.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 12, provided:

“All laws and parts of laws expressly in conflict with this act are repealed. No part of Act 796 of 1993 shall be impliedly repealed by this act or Act 1552 of 1999.”

Acts 2015, No. 412, § 1, provided:

“Legislative findings. The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

The State of Arkansas needs to take steps to increase and ensure the financial stability of the Unemployment Compensation Fund;

“(2)

Arkansas's unemployment costs to employers as the result of benefit amounts are higher than the surrounding states; and

“(3)

Adjusting the benefit amounts to be paid to claimants will increase the state's ability to maintain the Unemployment Compensation Fund and to compete in attracting businesses.”

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment added (b)(2); and rewrote (c)(2).

The 2015 amendment, in (a), added “For initial claims filed on or after the first day of the calendar quarter following the effective date of this act” in the beginning, substituted “average wages” for “total wages” and “four (4) quarters of his or her base period” for “one (1) quarter of his or her base period in which the wages were highest”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in the introductory language of (e).

11-10-503. Weekly benefits for partial unemployment.

Any insured worker who is unemployed in any week as defined in § 11-10-214 and who meets the eligibility requirements of §§ 11-10-507 — 11-10-511 shall be paid, with respect to the week, an amount equal to his or her weekly benefit amount less that part of any earnings payable to him or her with respect to the week that is in excess of forty percent (40%) of his or her weekly benefit amount.

The benefits, if not a multiple of one dollar ($1.00), shall be rounded to the next lower multiple of one dollar ($1.00).

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 3; 1943, No. 138, § 27; 1949, No. 155, § 3; 1955, No. 395, § 6; 1959, No. 13, § 2; 1963, No. 93, § 4; 1971, No. 35, § 7; 1983, No. 482, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1104; Acts 2007, No. 490, § 3.

Part-Time Employment.

A claimant who voluntarily leaves part-time employment is ineligible for further unemployment benefits only to the extent that his benefits would have been decreased by his part-time wages. Hopkins v. Stiles, 10 Ark. App. 77, 662 S.W.2d 177 (1983), rev'd, 282 Ark. 207, 666 S.W.2d 703 (1984).

Where it appeared from the record that, had claimant continued her part-time employment, her part-time wages were too small to have any effect on unemployment benefits which she was already receiving, claimant was entitled to unemployment benefits even though she voluntarily left part-time job without good cause. Hopkins v. Stiles, 10 Ark. App. 77, 662 S.W.2d 177 (1983), rev'd, 282 Ark. 207, 666 S.W.2d 703 (1984).

A claimant should not have been disqualified from receiving unemployment benefits as a result of her accepting part-time employment, when no suitable full-time employment was available. Coit v. Stiles, 12 Ark. App. 397, 678 S.W.2d 373 (1984), aff'd, 285 Ark. 212, 686 S.W.2d 405 (Ark. 1985).

Where the claimant failed to report part-time income on his unemployment compensation claim form, the Board of Review was justified in finding that the failure to report constituted a willful, false statement of a material fact, making the claimant liable for repayment of overpaid benefits under §§ 11-10-520 — 11-10-532; the failure to report was material, even though the amount of part-time income received by the claimant amounted to less than 40% of his weekly benefit. Coy v. Stiles, 13 Ark. App. 98, 679 S.W.2d 804 (1984).

Cited:

Lanoy v. Daniels, 271 Ark. 922, 611 S.W.2d 524 (1981); Jeffreys v. Everett, 6 Ark. App. 265, 640 S.W.2d 465 (1982); Young v. Everett, 6 Ark. App. 295, 641 S.W.2d 39 (1982); Thurman v. Everett, 6 Ark. App. 340, 642 S.W.2d 323 (1982); Farmer v. Everett, 8 Ark. App. 23, 648 S.W.2d 513 (1983); Stiles v. Hopkins, 282 Ark. 207, 666 S.W.2d 703 (1984); Nichols v. Stiles, 11 Ark. App. 212, 668 S.W.2d 554 (1984).

11-10-504. Maximum benefits payable.

For initial claims filed on or after January 1, 2018, the maximum potential benefits of an insured worker in a benefit year shall be the amount equal to the lesser of:

Sixteen (16) times his or her weekly benefit amount; or

One-third (1/3) of his or her wages for insured work in his or her base period.

If the total amount of benefits is not a multiple of his or her weekly benefit amount, it shall be computed to the next higher multiple of his or her weekly benefit amount.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 3; 1943, No. 138, § 28; 1947, No. 398, § 2; 1949, No. 155, § 3; 1955, No. 395, § 7; 1959, No. 13, § 1; 1981, No. 43, § 3; 1983, No. 482, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1104; Acts 2011, No. 861, § 2; 2015, No. 412, § 3; 2017, No. 734, § 3.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015, No. 412, § 1, provided: “Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

The State of Arkansas needs to take steps to increase and ensure the financial stability of the Unemployment Compensation Fund;

“(2)

Arkansas's unemployment costs to employers as the result of benefit amounts are higher than the surrounding states; and

“(3)

Adjusting the benefit amounts to be paid to claimants will increase the state's ability to maintain the Unemployment Compensation Fund and to compete in attracting businesses.”

Acts 2017, No. 734, § 1, provided: “Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

The State of Arkansas needs to take steps to ensure the financial stability of the Unemployment Compensation Fund;

“(2)

Arkansas's unemployment costs to employers are higher than some surrounding states;

“(3)

Arkansas employers have been paying increased unemployment taxes since 2009 as a result of a recession which dramatically increased unemployment; and

“(4)

Making the changes set forth in this bill will increase the stability of the Unemployment Compensation Fund and increase the state's employers' ability to compete in attracting businesses.”

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment substituted “Twenty-five (25)” for “Twenty-six (26)” in (a)(1).

The 2015 amendment, in (a), added “For initial claims filed on or after the first day of the calendar quarter following the effective date of this act” in the beginning, substituted “an insured worker” for “any insured worker”, and deleted “whichever is” preceding “the lesser of”; and substituted “Twenty (20)” for “Twenty-five (25)” in (a)(1).

The 2017 amendment substituted “January 1, 2018” for “the first day of the calendar quarter following July 22, 2015” in the introductory language of (a); and substituted “Sixteen (16)” for “Twenty (20)” in (a)(1).

11-10-505. Failure of base-period employer to respond.

A notice to the base-period employer shall be mailed or posted online, or both, promptly to each employer appearing on the claimant's monetary determination as a base-period employer.

Employers may choose to receive and respond to notice under this section through the mail or online, or both.

If any base-period employer fails to respond to the notice to the base-period employer within fifteen (15) calendar days, the employer shall be deemed to have waived the employer's right to respond.

The Director of the Division of Workforce Services may accept the statement given by the claimant as his or her reason for separation from the base-period employer and may base his or her determination on the statement given by the claimant.

The director shall adopt rules necessary to carry out this section.

The director shall make available on the website of the Division of Workforce Services a program that will allow employers the option to receive and respond to notice under this section.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 3; 1981, No. 43, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1104; Acts 2011, No. 1229, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 234, 235.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment inserted “or posted online, or both” in (a)(1)(A); inserted (a)(1)(B); substituted “fifteen (15) calendar days” for “such time as the Director of the Arkansas Employment Security Department shall by regulation prescribe” in (a)(2)(A); substituted “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” for “director” in (a)(1)(B); substituted “shall adopt rules” for “is authorized to establish such rules and regulations as may be” in (b); and added (c).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a)(2)(B); and, in (c), deleted “On or before January 1, 2012” from the beginning and substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services”.

11-10-506. Seasonal employment and benefit rights — Definitions.

As used in this section, the term “seasonal industry” means an industry in which, because of the seasonal nature thereof, it is customary to lay off forty percent (40%) or more of the average monthly number of workers for at least four (4) consecutive months during a regularly recurring period of each year and in which industry it is highly impracticable or impossible to continue seasonal operations throughout a period or periods of one (1) year in length. However, the total cessation of operations is not a prerequisite to classification as a seasonal industry.

After a study of previous employment records, and after investigation and hearing, the Director of the Division of Workforce Services shall determine the normal seasonal period or periods during which workers are ordinarily employed for the purpose of carrying on seasonal operations in each seasonal industry. Until the determination by the director, no industry shall be deemed to be seasonal. The director may initiate a study of an industry upon his or her own motion or upon a request filed with the director by any employing unit or person that would be affected by any determination made as a result of such a study. If a study is made, it shall be mandatory for the director to make his or her determination and report thereon within ninety (90) days after written application for the determination has been filed. If the director initiates the study of an industry upon his or her own motion and finds that the industry meets the seasonal requirements set forth in this section, he or she shall make his or her determination and report within ninety (90) days after the study is initiated. In either event, the industry shall be classified as a seasonal industry effective on the January 1 immediately following the date of the director's determination. Provided that, any employer who is classified as a seasonal employer under these provisions may make a written request to the director asking not to be treated as a seasonal employer. If the request is approved, treatment as a seasonal employer will cease effective January 1 of the following calendar year.

The director shall conduct, from time to time, studies of industries previously determined to be seasonal for the purpose of determining whether they should continue to be so classified.

If, after study, investigation, and hearing, the director finds that an industry no longer meets the seasonal requirements set forth herein, he or she shall issue a determination to that effect within ninety (90) days after the study was initiated.

The industry shall cease to be classified as a seasonal industry effective on the January 1 immediately following the date of determination.

The term “seasonal worker” means an individual who is employed in a seasonal industry, except that the term shall not include workers in industries where employment continues substantially throughout the year.

Any individual having earnings in a seasonal industry having a seasonal operating period within the limits shown in Column A of the table below and who has base period wages earned in the seasonal industry in the nonoperating season of the seasonal industry in an amount equal to the amount specified on the corresponding line of Column B of this table shall be considered as having employment which continues substantially throughout the year and shall not be considered a seasonal worker.

For purposes of this section, the term “average monthly number of workers” means the aggregate number of workers employed in the industry during the pay period that includes the twelfth day of each month in the peak period of operation divided by the number of months during the period.

The director shall prescribe fair and reasonable general rules consistent with this chapter and not inconsistent with general law applicable to seasonal workers for determining the period during which benefits shall be payable to them. The director may prescribe fair and reasonable general rules with respect to such other matters relating to benefits for seasonal workers as the director finds necessary and consistent with respect to such other matters relating to benefits for seasonal workers as the director finds necessary and consistent with general law.

The business of exploring for and the mining of coal and other minerals for use as fuel shall not be deemed to be a seasonal industry as defined in this section.

A Operating Period of Seasonal Industry B Wages Earned in Seasonal Industry During Nonoperating Period 7 - 8 Months 24 Times Weekly Benefit Amount 2 - 6 Months 30 Times Weekly Benefit Amount

Click to view table.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 3; 1943, No. 174, §§ 1, 3; 1953, No. 162, § 1; 1981, No. 43, § 4; 1983, No. 482, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-1104, 81-1110; Acts 1989, No. 420, § 5; 1991, No. 100, § 26; 2001, No. 1367, § 4; 2019, No. 910, § 236.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted designation (a)(2)(A); and substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in the first sentence of (a)(2).

11-10-507. Eligibility — Conditions — Definitions.

An insured worker shall be eligible to receive benefits with respect to any week only if the Director of the Division of Workforce Services finds that:

Claim for Benefits. He or she has made a claim for benefits with respect to such week in accordance with such rules as the director may prescribe;

Registration and Reporting. He or she has registered for work at and thereafter continued to report to a Division of Workforce Services office in accordance with such rules as the director may prescribe. The director, by rule, may waive or alter either or both of the requirements of this subdivision (2) as to individuals attached to regular jobs and as to such other types of cases or situations with respect to which he or she finds that compliance with these requirements would be oppressive or would be inconsistent with the purpose of this chapter. However, no such rules shall conflict with § 11-10-501;

Able to Work and Available for Work.

The worker is unemployed, is physically and mentally able to perform suitable work, and is available for the work. Mere registration and reporting at a local employment office shall not be conclusive evidence of ability to work, availability for work, or willingness to accept work unless the individual is doing those things which a reasonably prudent individual would be expected to do to secure work.

In determining suitable work under this section and for refusing to apply for or accept suitable work under § 11-10-515, part-time work shall be considered suitable work unless the majority of weeks of work in the period used to determine monetary eligibility are from full-time work.

In determining suitable work under this section or under § 11-10-515 for a worker who is on an approved medical leave from his or her last employer due to the unavailability of light-duty work, light-duty work shall be considered suitable work unless the majority of the number of weeks of work within the period used to determine monetary eligibility were weeks spent performing work that the worker is currently unable to perform due to his or her medical restrictions.

Persons who are on layoff and who are attending a state vocational school for the purpose of upgrading or improving their job skills shall be considered available for employment so long as they make reasonable efforts to secure employment unless, or until, they refuse suitable employment or referral or recall to suitable work. However, no otherwise eligible individual shall be denied benefits with respect to any week in which he or she is in training with the approval of the director by reason of the application of the provisions of subdivision (3)(A) of this section relating to availability for work.

For the purpose of this subdivision (3), the approval by the director of training for an individual shall be based on the following considerations:

The claimant's skills must be obsolete, or the demands for his or her skills in his or her labor market must be minimal and not likely to improve;

The claimant must possess aptitudes or skills which can be usefully supplemented within a short time by retraining;

The training must be for an occupation for which there is a substantial and recurring demand; and

The claimant must produce evidence of continued attendance and satisfactory progress.

In the event of the death of an individual's immediate family member, the eligibility requirements of availability for that individual shall be waived for the day of the death and for six (6) consecutive calendar days thereafter. For the purposes of this subdivision (3), “immediate family member” means a spouse, child, parent, brother, sister, grandchild, or grandparent of the individual.

An individual on short-term layoff who expects to be recalled by his or her employer to a full-time job and whose employer intends to recall the individual to a full-time job within ten (10) weeks after the initial date of his or her layoff shall not be required during the layoff to register for work at a division office or to seek other work.

Any individual who is not actively engaged in seeking work because he or she is before any court of the United States or of any state pursuant to a lawfully issued summons to appear for jury duty shall not be disqualified under this subdivision (3).

No individual shall be considered unavailable for work under this subdivision (3) during the entire week if he or she is required to withdraw from the labor market for less than four (4) days of the week because of a compelling personal emergency.

The individual participates in reemployment services, such as job search assistance services, if the individual has been determined to be likely to exhaust regular benefits and to need reemployment services pursuant to a profiling system established by the director, as provided for in section 4 of Pub. L. No. 103-152, unless the director determines that:

The individual has completed such services; or

There is justifiable cause for the claimant's failure to participate in such services;

Waiting Period. He or she has been unemployed for a waiting period of one (1) week. A week shall not be counted as a week of unemployment for the purposes of this subdivision (4):

Unless it occurs within the benefit year which includes the week with respect to which he or she claims payment of benefits;

If benefits have been paid with respect thereto; and

Unless the individual was eligible for benefits with respect thereto as provided in this section and §§ 11-10-512 — 11-10-519, except for the requirements of this subdivision (4); and

Qualifying Wages. For any benefit year, he or she has during his or her base period been paid wages in at least two (2) quarters of his or her base period for insured work, and the total wages paid during his or her base period equal not less than thirty-five (35) times his or her weekly benefit amount.

Requalifying Wages. For all benefit years, an individual shall not requalify on a succeeding benefit year claim unless he or she has been paid wages for insured work equal to not less than thirty-five (35) times his or her weekly benefit amount and has wages paid for insured work in at least two (2) calendar quarters of his or her base period and, subsequent to filing the claim that established his or her previous benefit year, he or she has had insured work and was paid wages for insured work equal to ten (10) times his or her weekly benefit amount.

With respect to weeks of unemployment, wages for insured work shall include wages paid for previously uncovered services. For the purposes of this section, the term “previously uncovered services” means services:

Which were not employment as defined in § 11-10-210(a) and were not services covered pursuant to § 11-10-210(d) at any time during the one-year period; and

Which are:

Agricultural labor, as defined in § 11-10-210(f)(1); or

Services performed by an employee of a political subdivision of this state, as provided in § 11-10-210(a)(2)(B), or by an employee of a nonprofit educational institution which is not an institution of higher education, as provided in § 11-10-210(a)(3), except to the extent that assistance under Title II of the Emergency Jobs and Unemployment Assistance Act of 1974 was paid on the basis of such services.

For the purpose of this subdivision (5), wages shall be counted as “wages for insured work” for benefit purposes with respect to any benefit year only if the benefit year begins subsequent to the date on which the employing unit by which the wages were paid has satisfied the conditions of § 11-10-209 with respect to becoming an employer.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 4; 1943, No. 138, § 29; 1947, No. 398, § 3; 1949, No. 155, § 4; 1953, No. 162, § 2; 1959, No. 13, § 3; 1963, No. 93, § 5; 1971, No. 35, § 8; 1973, No. 329, § 5; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1083, § 5; 1977, No. 376, § 7; 1979, No. 492, § 4; 1979, No. 922, § 4; 1981, No. 43, §§ 6, 7; 1983, No. 482, §§ 13, 14; 1985, No. 8, § 5; 1985, No. 9, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1105; reen. Acts 1987, No. 672, § 4; Acts 1987, No. 753, § 12; 1989, No. 420, § 6; 1991, No. 48, § 3; 1991, No. 100, § 27; 1993, No. 6, § 5; 1995, No. 519, § 5; 1999, No. 1116, § 9; 2003, No. 1223, § 4; 2009, No. 653, §§ 2, 3; 2009, No. 802, § 3; 2011, No. 861, § 3; 2019, No. 315, § 820; 2019, No. 453, §§ 1, 2; 2019, No. 910, §§
237-239.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Part of this section was reenacted by Acts 1987, No. 672, § 4. Acts 1987, No. 834 provided that 1987 legislation reenacting acts passed in the 1976 Extended Session should not repeal any other 1987 legislation and that such other legislation would be controlling in the event of conflict.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment substituted “thirty-five (35)” for “twenty-seven (27)” in (5)(A) and (5)(B); and substituted “eight (8)” for “three (3)” in (5)(B).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (1) and twice in (2); and substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 453 redesignated (3)(A) as (3)(A)(i) and (3)(A)(ii) and added (3)(A)(iii); in (5)(B), inserted the fourth occurrence of “insured” and substituted “ten (10) times” for “eight (8) times”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in the introductory language of the section; substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services” in (2); and substituted “division” for “department” in (3)(E).

U.S. Code.

As to Title II of the Emergency Jobs and Unemployment Assistance Act of 1974, referred to in this section, see notes under 26 U.S.C. § 3304.

Public Law 103-152, § 4, referred to in this section, is codified as 42 U.S.C. §§ 503 and 504.

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 453, § 11: Oct. 1, 2019.

11-10-508. Eligibility — Labor dispute — Exceptions.

If so found by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services, no individual may serve a waiting period or be paid benefits for the duration of any period of unemployment if he or she lost his or her employment or has left his or her employment by reason of a labor dispute other than a lockout at the factory, establishment, or other premises at which he or she was employed, regardless of whether or not the labor dispute causes any reduction or cessation of operations at the factory, establishment, or other premises of the employer, as long as the labor dispute continues, and thereafter for such reasonable period of time, if any, as may be necessary for that factory, establishment, or other premises to resume normal operation.

However, this section shall not apply if it is shown that the individual is not participating in or directly interested in the labor dispute and he or she does not belong to a grade or class of workers of which, immediately before the commencement of the labor dispute, there were members employed at the factory, establishment, or other premises at which the labor dispute occurs, any of whom are participating in or directly interested in the labor dispute.

If in any case, separate branches of work, which are commonly conducted as separate businesses in separate premises, are conducted in separate departments of the same premises, each such department shall, for the purpose of this section, be deemed to be a separate factory, establishment, or other premises.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 4; 1955, No. 395, § 8; 1959, No. 99, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1105; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 240.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment
substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a).

11-10-509. Eligibility — Employees of educational institutions.

With respect to service performed in an instructional, research, or principal administrative capacity as an employee of an educational institution, benefits shall not be paid based on services for any week of unemployment commencing during the period between two (2) successive academic years or terms, during a similar period between two (2) regular but not successive terms, or during a period of paid sabbatical leave provided for in the individual's contract to any individual if:

The individual performs the services in the first of the academic years or terms; and

There is a contract or a reasonable assurance that the individual will perform services in any such capacity as an employee of any educational institution in the second of the academic years or terms.

With respect to services performed in any other capacity as an employee of an educational institution, benefits shall not be paid on the basis of services to any individual for any week of unemployment that commences during a period between two (2) successive academic years or terms if:

The individual performs the services in the first of the academic years or terms; and

There is a reasonable assurance that the individual will perform the services in the second of the academic years or terms.

If compensation is denied to an individual under subdivision (b)(1) of this section and the individual was not offered an opportunity to perform the services as an employee of the educational institution for the second of the academic years or terms, the individual, if otherwise eligible, is entitled to a retroactive payment of compensation for each week for which the individual filed a timely claim for compensation and for which compensation was denied solely by reason of subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

The individual shall apply for the retroactive payment described in subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section within two (2) weeks after receipt of notification from the educational institution that he or she will not have an opportunity to perform the services at that educational institution in the second academic year or term.

With respect to any services described in subsection (a) or (b) of this section, compensation payable on the basis of these services shall not be payable to any individual for any week of unemployment that commences during an established and customary vacation period or holiday recess if:

The individual performs these services in the period immediately before a vacation or holiday recess; and

There is a reasonable assurance that the individual will perform the services in the period immediately following the vacation period or holiday recess.

With respect to any services described in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, compensation payable on the basis of services in any such capacity shall be denied as specified in subsections (a)-(c) of this section to any individual who performed the services in an educational institution while in the employ of an educational service agency.

For purposes of this subdivision, the term “educational service agency” means a governmental agency or governmental entity which is established and operated exclusively for the purpose of providing such services to one (1) or more educational institutions.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 4; 1977, No. 376, § 8; 1977, No. 589, § 1; 1977 (Ex. Sess.), No. 25, § 1; 1979, No. 492, § 5; 1979, No. 922, § 5; 1981, No. 43, §§ 6, 7; 1983, No. 482, § 15; 1985, No. 8, § 6; 1985, No. 9, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1105; Acts 1987, No. 753, § 13; 1989, No. 420, § 7; 1997, No. 1360, §§ 101, 102; 1999, No. 1116, § 10; 1999, No. 1537, § 126; 2007, No. 490, § 4; 2009, No. 653, § 4; 2011, No. 1040, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment substituted “as an employee of ” for “for” in (a), (a)(2), (b)(1), and (b)(2)(A).

11-10-510. Ineligibility — Service in sports or athletics.

Benefits shall not be paid to any individual on the basis of any services substantially all of which consist of participating in sports or athletic events or training or preparing to so participate for any week that commences during the period between two (2) successive sport seasons or similar periods if the individual performed the services in the first of the seasons or similar periods and there is a reasonable assurance that the individual will perform these services in the later of such seasons or similar periods.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 4; 1975, No. 721, § 1; 1977, No. 376, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1105.

11-10-511. Ineligibility — Aliens — Exception.

Benefits shall not be payable on the basis of services performed by an alien unless the alien is an individual who was lawfully admitted for permanent residence at the time the services were performed, was lawfully present for purposes of performing those services, or was permanently residing in the United States under color of law at the time the services were performed, including an alien who was lawfully present in the United States as a result of the application of the provisions of § 212(d)(5) of the Immigration and Nationality Act.

Any data or information required of individuals applying for benefits to determine whether benefits are not payable to them because of their alien status shall be uniformly required from all applicants for benefits.

In the case of an individual whose application for benefits would otherwise be approved, no determination that benefits to the individual are not payable because of his alien status shall be made except upon a preponderance of the evidence.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 4; 1977, No. 376, § 10; 1979, No. 492, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1105; Acts 1993, No. 6, § 6.

U.S. Code.

Section 212(d)(5) of the Immigration and Nationality Act, referred to in this section, is codified as 8 U.S.C. § 1182.

11-10-512. Disqualification — Satisfaction.

“Week of Unemployment” Defined. A “week of unemployment” as used in this section and § 11-10-519 means a week during which, except for a disqualification, an individual would be eligible for benefits.

“Week of Disqualification” Defined. A “week of disqualification” as used in this section and § 11-10-519(a)(2) shall be satisfied by a week of unemployment as defined in this section or by a week of employment during which the employee has earnings in an amount equal to his or her weekly benefit amount.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 5; 1949, No. 155, § 5; 1953, No. 162, § 3; 1955, No. 395, § 20; 1971, No. 35, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1106; Acts 2001, No. 1367, § 5; 2019, No. 453, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment, in (a), substituted “this section and § 11-10-519” for “this section and §§ 11-10-514, 11-10-515, 11-10-517, and 11-10-519”; substituted “as used in this section” for “under §§ 11-10-514(a), 11-10-515” in (b); and deleted former (b)(2).

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 453, § 11: Oct. 1, 2019.